Utah statutes.
41-1a-1318.   Second degree felony -- Fraudulent alteration of identification number.

(1)  It is a second degree felony for a person  with fraudulent intent to:

(a)  deface, destroy, or alter the  identification number or state assigned identification number of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer;

(b)  place or stamp, without authority by the division, something other than the original identification or state assigned identification number upon a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer; or

(c)  sell or offer for sale a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer bearing an altered or defaced identification or state  assigned identification number other than the original or the state assigned identification number.

(2)  This section does not prevent any manufacturer, importer, or any agent, other than a dealer, from placing or stamping in the ordinary course of business numbers on motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers registered under this chapter.

(3)  This section does not prohibit the restoration by an owner of an original identification number when the restoration is made under permit issued by the division.

